Ohio, session 136, HB395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4141.34 of the Revised Code be 6
amended to read as follows: 7
Sec. 4141.34. (A) The director of job and family services 8
shall establish and maintain a process for an employer to report 9
that either of the following: 10
(1) That an applicant for or recipient of benefits has 11
failed or is failing to meet any of the eligibility requirements 12
described in division (A) of section 4141.29 of the Revised 13
Code; 14
(2) That an applicant for or recipient of benefits has 15
failed to appear for a scheduled job interview with the 16
employer. 17
(B) The process shall allow an employer to make a 18
complaint through a conspicuous internet link located on the 19

H. B. No. 395 Page 2
As Introduced
internet web site maintained by the department of job and family 20
services. The director shall review all complaints received 21
through this process in a timely manner. 22
Section 2. That existing section 4141.34 of the Revised 23
Code is hereby repealed. 24